Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 9. Wyoming Council on the Arts

Subarticle A General Provisions

§ 9-2-901.
Creation; membership; appointment; removal; qualifications; recommendations thereto; definitions.

The Wyoming arts council board is created as an advisory board within the department of state parks and cultural resources, consisting of ten (10) members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate who are removable by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The members shall be residents of Wyoming who are known for their competence and experience in the arts.

In making appointments, due consideration shall be given to the recommendations made by representative civic, educational and professional associations and groups, concerned with or engaged in the productions or presentation of the performing and fine arts generally.

As used in this article:

“Board” means the Wyoming arts council board created in subsection (a) of this section;

“Department” means the department of state parks and cultural resources.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:4; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1801; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2009, ch. 101, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a) deleted “council on the” preceding “arts” and inserted “council board” thereafter, substituted “board” for “council” following “advisory” and inserted “and confirmed by the senate” following “governor” in the first sentence and substituted “in the arts” for “in all fields of the performing and fine arts” in the second sentence,
and added (c).

§ 9-2-902.
Terms of members; vacancies; chairman and vice-chairman; expenses; personnel.

The term of office of each member of the board is three (3) years. Vacancies shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term. The board shall select from its membership a chairman and vice-chairman. The members of the board shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for travel and per diem expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 140, § 3.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 188, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-276.18:5, 9-276.18:6; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1802, 9-3-1803; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 140, § 3; 2009, ch. 101, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “board” for “council” in (a).

§ 9-2-903.
Duties of department; duties of board.

The department, in consultation with the board, shall:

Stimulate and encourage throughout the state the study and presentation of the performing and fine arts and develop public interest and participation therein;

Make surveys of public and private institutions engaged within the state in:

Artistic and cultural activities, including music, theater, dance, painting, sculpture, architecture; and

Allied arts and crafts such as photography, literature, creative writing, poetry, films, television, radio, sound recording, costume and fashion design, industrial design, ceramic design and folk art.

Develop appropriate methods and programs to encourage participation in and appreciation of the arts to meet the legitimate needs and aspirations of persons in all parts of the state;

Encourage public interest in the cultural heritage of our state and expand the state’s cultural resources;

Encourage and assist freedom of artistic expression essential for the well-being of the arts;

Administer and acquire works of art for public buildings in accordance with W.S.

16-6-801

through

16-6-805

.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 101, § 2.

The board may:

Work with the department to encourage and facilitate public interest in the cultural heritage of the state and to expand the state’s cultural resources;

Advise the department on program planning and policy formulation including fiscal policies;

Participate in the development and review of long and short range plans for the arts in Wyoming and advise the department in developing policies to implement those plans;

Make recommendations to the director of the department and administrator of the division of cultural resources within the department on the selection of the manager of the Wyoming arts council program;

Appoint committees and task forces to carry out any duties deemed necessary by the board;

Chair grant review committees or panels and approve the membership of grant review panels, committees and artist rosters;

Consider recommendations of grant review committees and panels and approve grants to artists, arts organizations and other applicants;

Review and recommend to the department a budget for arts programs and advise the department on the allocation of state and federal funds;

Review and recommend arts programs, approve guidelines for programs and oversee the arts grant making functions of the department;

Actively promote and advocate for the arts throughout the state and the region.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 188, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:7; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1804; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 171, § 2; ch. 172, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2009, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (a) deleted “of state parks and cultural resources” following “department” and substituted “board” for “council”, in (a)(iii) substituted “Develop” for “make recommendations concerning” and inserted “and programs”; repealed former (b) pertaining to the duties of the Wyoming council of the arts; and added (c).

§ 9-2-904.
Powers; receipt of assistance and data; receipt of money and property.

The board may:

Hold public hearings;

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 101, § 2.

Appoint advisory committees as it deems necessary to carry out its duties.

The department of state parks and cultural resources may request and shall receive from any department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of the state assistance and data which will enable it properly to carry out its powers and duties hereunder.

The department may receive any money or property of any kind or character, donated, granted or bequeathed to the board, the department or to the state of Wyoming for the purposes of furthering the objectives of the department’s arts program. Money received and the proceeds of other property received under this subsection shall be deposited in a separate revenue account to be expended upon legislative appropriation for purposes of this article.

The department may:

Hold public hearings;

Enter into contracts for services and award grants furthering the objectives of the department’s arts program; and

Enter into contracts with local and regional associations for cooperative endeavors furthering the objectives of the department’s arts program.

The department is designated as the official state agency for purposes of receiving and disbursing any federal funds made available for purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 188, §§ 5, 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-276.18:8, 9-276.18:10; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1805, 9-3-1807; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 140, § 2; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2009, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “board” for “council”, in (a)(i) deleted “and private” preceding “hearings”, repealed former (a)(ii) and (a)(iii) concerning authority for entering into contracts, and added (a)(iv); in (c) substituted “board, the department” for “council” and “arts program” for “programs” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and added (d).

Subarticle B Endowments

§ 9-2-905.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; 2009, ch. 101, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 9-2-906.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 101, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 9-2-907.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; 2009, ch. 101, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 9-2-908.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2009, ch. 101, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 9-2-909.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 9-2-910.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; 2009, ch. 101, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 9-2-911.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1991, ch. 171, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 110, § 103, effective July 1, 2014.